src/scripts/English/gpos.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# The original tagger is defined in festival/lib/pos.scm

define In about | after | against | among | as | at | because | before | between | by | down | for | from | if | in | into | new | of | on | over | per | that | through | under | until | up | while | with | without | than ;
define To to;
define Det a | all | an | another | any | both | each | every | many | neither | no | some | the | these | this | those;
define Md can | could | may | might | must | ought | should | will | would;
define Cc and | but | nor | or | plus | yet;
define Wp how | what | when | where | who;
define Pps her | his | its | mine | our | their;
define Aux am | are | be | had | has | have | is | was | were;

define FunctionWord In | To | Det | Md | Cc | Wp | Pps | Aux;

regex 
In -> in || _ ,, 
To -> to || _ ,, 
Det -> det || _ ,, 
Md -> md || _ ,, 
Cc -> cc || _ ,, 
Wp -> wp || _ ,, 
Pps -> pps || _ ,, 
Aux -> aux || _ ,, 
\FunctionWord -> content || _ ;
